Hawaii statutes.
§508D-15 Notification required; ambiguity.
(a) When residential real property lies:

(1) Within the boundaries of a special flood hazard
area as officially designated on Flood Insurance Administration maps
promulgated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
for the purposes of determining eligibility for emergency flood insurance
programs;

(2) Within the boundaries of the noise exposure area
shown on maps prepared by the department of transportation in accordance with
Federal Aviation Regulation Part 150-Airport Noise Compatibility Planning (14
Code of Federal Regulations Part 150) for any public airport;

(3) Within the boundaries of the Air Installation
Compatibility Use Zone of any Air Force, Army, Navy, or Marine Corps airport as
officially designated by military authorities; or

(4) Within the anticipated inundation areas
designated on the department of defense's emergency management tsunami
inundation maps;

subject to the availability of maps that designate
the four areas by tax map key (zone, section, parcel), the seller shall include
such material fact information in the disclosure statement provided to the
buyer subject to this chapter. Each county shall provide, where available,
maps of its jurisdiction detailing the four designated areas specified in this
subsection. The maps shall identify the properties situated within the four
designated areas by tax map key number (zone, section, parcel) and shall be of
a size sufficient to provide information necessary to serve the purposes of
this section. Each county shall provide legible copies of the maps and may
charge a reasonable copying fee.

(b) When it is questionable whether
residential real property lies within any of the designated areas referred to
in subsection (a) due to the inherent ambiguity of boundary lines drawn on maps
of large scale, the ambiguity shall be construed in favor of the seller;
provided that a good faith effort has been made to determine the applicability
of subsection (a) to the subject real property.

(c) Except as required under subsections (a)
and (b), and as required under section 508D-3.5, the seller shall have no duty
to examine any public record when preparing a disclosure statement. [L 1994, c
214, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 161, §15; am L 2001, c 224, pt of §7; am L 2008, c
191, §3; am L 2013, c 186, §5; am L 2014, c 111, §28]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next